District of Columbia statutes.
29A-607

Repealed

Land — Restriction on holdings.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1281, ch. 854, § 580
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-407.
1981 Ed., § 29-807.
2001 Ed., § 29-607.